Illinois, session 104th, HB5758.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Human Services for payment to McLean 7County for all costs associated with providing behavioral and 8mental health treatment and services in the county. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.